Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7044.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 34-37.1 of the General Laws entitled "Homeless Bill of Rights" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
34-37.1-7. Homeless shelter standard.
(a) Findings. The general assembly finds and declares as follows:
(1) That all homeless persons have the right to homeless shelter services, regardless of their
political or religious beliefs, immigration status, former geographic location of residence, ethno-
cultural background, (dis)ability, gender identity, criminal background, and/or sexual orientation;
(2) That no shelter should charge a fee nor expect and/or require compensation from
clients/residents for any services rendered;
(3) That homeless shelters should provide an atmosphere of dignity and respect for all
shelter residents, and provide services in a non-judgmental manner;
(4) That shelter residents are capable of moving toward increasing levels of self-reliance
and self-determination. Shelter staff should work with residents to assist them in achieving their
goals;
(5) That homeless shelters should be sensitive to the ethno-specific and linguistic needs of
residents;
(6) That service providers need to accept gender identity, as defined by the individual,
rather than by the perception of staff and/or other residents;
(7) That protecting the privacy and confidentiality of shelter residents and their personal

information is of the utmost importance;
(8) That all people staying in homeless shelters should have access to safe and nutritious
food;
(9) That the health and safety of shelter residents, volunteers, and staff, shall be of the
highest importance in each shelter;
(10) That issuing service restrictions in the shelter system, must be done only as a last resort
and in the most serious cases;
(11) That everyone is entitled to shelter service whether or not they use controlled
substances and service policies, should not be based on controlled substance use alone, except for
those shelters operating on an abstinence or recovery model basis;
(12) That shelter residents should be involved in service provision, program planning,
development and evaluation, and policy development;
(13) That homeless shelters, that include children and youth, provide support and activities
and ensure that the school-related recreation and treatment needs of resident children are met on
site, through community based services;
(14) That homeless shelters should afford an opportunity for children and youth with
developmental and/or physical disabilities, to develop to their full potential within an environment
where they can interact and socialize with other children;
(15) That shelters are part of a larger network of homeless services and agencies and
collaboration within this network is important to ensure effective and coordinated services;
(16) That notification of shelter closure (either emergency or permanent shelter) should be
done as soon as the provider is aware of the potential closure and posted in a common area. The
provider should notify their residents, and the office of housing and community development,
within the division of planning of the department of administration; and
(17) That all shelters should utilize the Rhode Island homeless management information
system (HMIS) database, and make entries in a timely manner.
(b) The chair of the Rhode Island housing resources commission, shall appoint an eleven
(11) member committee to draft recommended regulations for homeless shelters and provide
recommendations, related to the operation of homeless shelters for consideration by the
commission in preparation of the state's plan for housing, pursuant to the provisions of § 42-128-
8. The members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) One homeless or formerly homeless person;
(2) Two (2) representatives of the Rhode Island Homeless Advocacy Project;
(3) One representative of the Rhode Island Coalition for the Homeless;
LC003764 - Page 2 of 4

(4) Two (2) homeless shelter providers operating a shelter for individuals;
(5) Two (2) homeless shelter providers operating a shelter for families;
(6) One representative from the Rhode Island office of housing and community
development;
(7) One domestic violence shelter provider; and
(8) One resident or former resident of a domestic violence shelter.
(c) The committee shall elect a chair or co-chairs from among their membership.
(d)(1) The committee shall define the characteristics of a homeless shelter, that shall be
subject to the regulations and standards established by this section.
(2) The committee shall be charged with making recommendations for the formulation of
regulations and standards to address the following topics and areas of concern:
(i) Baseline organizational standards that any agency operating a homeless shelter must
meet;
(ii) Access to shelter guidelines, including admission and discharge, bed registration,
substance use, and service restrictions;
(iii) Residents' rights and responsibilities, including resident input, complaints and appeals,
and grievance procedures;
(iv) Program standards, including the provision of essential services, counseling supports,
daytime access, confidentiality, sharing of resident information, safeguarding resident files, and
staff code of conduct;
(v) Health and safety standards, including basic health and safety protocols, the safeguard
of, and access to, resident medication, a policy on weapons, and requirements for staff training on
health and safety issues; and
(vi) Emergency and winter shelter standards, including the definition of inclement weather
events, in all seasons, that trigger requirements for homeless shelters to stay open for the protection
of residents.
(3) Except to the extent specifically required by statute, no shelter regulation shall deny
access to, or otherwise impose additional restrictions upon, individuals due to their being subject
to community notification requirements, nor shall any state or municipal agency request or require
a shelter to impose any such restrictions.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003764
========
LC003764 - Page 3 of 4